California statutes. Education Code
(a) “Arts education program” includes, but is not limited to, instruction and training, supplies, materials, and arts educational partnership programs, for instruction in: dance, media arts, music, theatre, and visual arts, including folk art, painting, sculpture, photography, and craft arts, creative expressions, including graphic arts and design, computer coding, animation, music composition and ensembles, and script writing, costume design, film, and video.

(b) “Economically disadvantaged pupil” means a pupil who is eligible for the federal National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq.) or any successor program.

(c) “Enrollment” means every preschool, transitional kindergarten, and K–12 pupil enrolled in a local educational agency and schoolsite. A “preschool pupil” means a pupil enrolled in the California state preschool program or a pupil three years of age through five years of age enrolled in a preschool program for pupils with exceptional needs in a local educational agency.

(d) “Local educational agency” includes K–12 school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and the California school for the blind and the California school for the deaf.

(e) “Supplement” means that the funds appropriated by this chapter shall be used by local educational agencies to increase funding of arts education programs and not to supplant existing funding for those programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 49, Sec. 2.   (SB 115)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8822.

(a) If any provision of this act or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. 

(b) This act is intended to be comprehensive. It is the intent of the people that in the event this act or acts relating to the same subject shall appear on the same statewide election ballot, the provisions of the other act or acts shall be deemed to be in conflict with this act. In the event that this act receives a greater number of affirmative votes, the provisions of this act shall prevail in their entirety, and all provisions of the
 other act or acts shall be null and void.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (j) of Section 8820, the Legislature may amend this chapter to further its purposes by a bill passed in each house by rollcall vote entered into the journal, two-thirds of the membership of each house concurring.

(History: Added November 8, 2022, by initiative Proposition 28, Sec. 2.1.   Effective December 21, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Family Relationships and Parenting Education [8850.5. - 8850.5.]

8850.5.

“Family relationships and parenting education,” as used in this chapter, means an instructional program designed to provide pupils at all grade levels with age-appropriate components, including all of the following:

(a) Development of an understanding of the physical, mental, emotional, social, economic, and psychological aspects of themselves and others, and of the physiological, psychological, and cultural foundations of human development.

(b) The opportunity to acquire knowledge which will support the development of responsible family relationships, strengthen the pupil’s current family life, and further the understanding of the role of the parent.

(c) Development of an understanding of the consequences of decisions and actions upon personal, family, and peer relationships.

(d) Recognition of, and attention to, the significance of healthy self-esteem in the growth and development of healthy human beings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1619, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. California Community Schools Partnership Act [8900. - 8903.]

8900.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Community Schools Partnership Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 8.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8901.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adjacent location” means an alternative location for services for pupils pursuant to this section that is within a one-half mile of the qualifying entity’s schoolsite.

(b) “Community school” means a public school serving preschool, transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with strong and intentional community partnerships ensuring pupil learning and whole child and family development, and specifically includes the following:

(1) Integrated supports services, including the coordination of trauma-informed health, mental health, and social services that
 ensure coordination and support with county and local educational agency resources and nongovernmental organizations, and early screening and intervention for learning and other needs.

(2) Family, pupil, schoolsite staff, and community engagement, which may include home visits, home-school collaboration, culturally responsive community partnerships to strengthen family well-being and stability, and school climate surveys.

(3) Collaborative leadership and practices for educators and administrators, including professional development to transform school culture and climate, that centers on pupil learning and supports mental and behavioral health, trauma-informed care, social-emotional learning, restorative justice, and other key areas relating to pupil learning and whole child and family development.

(4) Extended
 learning time and opportunities, including before and after school care and summer programs.

(c) “Community Schools framework” means the framework for the California Community Schools Partnership Act described in Section 8901.5.

(d) “Consortium” means either of the following:

(1) Two or more local educational agencies.

(2) One or more local educational agencies, one of whom
 shall serve as the fiscal agent, and one or more cooperating agencies providing services pursuant to this section at a schoolsite or adjacent location.

(e) “Cooperating agency” means a federal, state, or local agency or public or private nonprofit entity that agrees to offer support services at a schoolsite, an adjacent location, or virtually through a program implemented under this chapter. Cooperating agencies include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A county behavioral health agency that will operate the program in partnership with at least one local educational agency that is a
 qualifying entity.

(2) A federal Head Start or Early Head Start program or other government-funded early childhood program or agency that will operate the program in partnership with at least one local educational agency that is a qualifying entity.

(3) A childcare program or agency within a public institution of higher education that will operate the program in partnership with at least one local educational agency that is a qualifying entity.

(f) “Dream Resource Center” means a public high school initiative to provide pupils, including
 undocumented pupils, in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, with resources that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Postsecondary financial aid support, such as assistance with the completion of the California Dream Act Application.

(2) Social services support.

(3) State-funded immigration legal services.

(4) Academic advising and referrals to academic support and enrichment opportunities.

(5) Parent and family workshops.

(g) “Education interestholders” includes groups involved in community schools implementation, such as schools
 receiving community schools funding, community schools advisory bodies at the local, regional, and state levels, community-based organizations, state-funded technical assistance providers, education advocates, adult education programs, and labor partners.

(h) (1) “Eligible schoolsite” means either of the following:

(A) An individual school within a local educational agency, excluding a charter school classified as a nonclassroom-based charter school, with an unduplicated pupil percentage of 65 percent or more and 10 or more pupils enrolled based on prior year Fall 1 census day pupil data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. The unduplicated pupil percentage for an individual school shall be calculated by dividing
 the sum of the number of unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, by the school’s total enrollment.

(B) An individual school within a local educational agency, including a charter school classified as a nonclassroom-based charter, that receives a community schools implementation grant pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 8902.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that nonclassroom-based charter schools will become eligible local educational agencies pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), beginning in 2031, commencing with the availability of a certification process for community school models.

(i) “Lead agency” means the department.

(j) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(k) “Network” means a group of schools that function as a learning community and are supported by a local educational agency that coordinates services and resources for their
 pupils, families, and staff. Participation in a network is at the discretion of a school’s local educational agency governing board.

(l) “Partner” means a private business, nonprofit, public or nonprofit institutions of higher education, or foundation that provides financial assistance or otherwise assists a program operating under this chapter.

(m) “Promise
 Neighborhood” means a targeted geographic area served by the Promise Neighborhoods program, as authorized by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95), or a collaborative network of service providers that serves geographically defined areas or neighborhoods and focuses on revitalizing economically-disadvantaged communities through the establishment of a cradle-to-career network of services aimed at improving the health, safety, and education of the occupants in the defined area.

(n) “Qualifying entity” means an entity that is any of the following:

(1) A local educational agency or a consortium that meets any of the following criteria, as applied to the entire pupil population of pupils enrolled in the local educational agency or
 consortium:

(A) Fifty percent or more of the enrolled pupils at the local educational agency or the consortium are unduplicated pupils.

(B) The local educational agency or the consortium has higher than state average dropout rates.

(C) The local educational agency or the consortium has higher than state average rates of suspension and expulsion.

(D) The local educational agency or the consortium has higher than state average rates of child homelessness, foster youth, or justice-involved youth.

(2) A local educational agency or consortium, on behalf of one or more schools within the local educational agency or consortium that satisfy any of the criteria in subparagraphs (A) to (D),
 inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(o) “Regional technical assistance center” and “regional transformational assistance center” may be used interchangeably.

(p) “Secondary community school” means a school serving pupils in grade 6 and higher, typically a middle or high school. Secondary community schools are characterized by strong relationships between pupils, families, staff, and community that center pupil well-being and college and career pathways, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Relational learning environments where pupils are well-known by staff, which may include small schools or small learning
 communities within schools featuring teaching teams that share pupils and advisory systems that enable personalization.

(2) Community and governmental partnerships that support pupil well-being and provide experiential learning opportunities, including community-connected projects, service opportunities, civic learning, internships, and youth leadership opportunities.

(3) Partnerships with local business and higher education that support career pathways, dual enrollment, and dual credit opportunities, to the extent feasible.

(4) Family partnerships that support pupil well-being and college and career readiness, including guidance on academic and social supports, as well as college and career access, including financial aid.

(5) Purposeful implementation
 of social-emotional learning and restorative practices to build an environment of safety and belonging.

(q) “State technical assistance center” and “state transformational assistance center” may be used interchangeably.

(r) “Support services” includes case-managed health, mental health, social, and academic support services benefiting children and their families, and may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Health care, including all of the following:

(A) Immunizations.

(B) Vision and hearing testing and services.

(C) Dental services.

(D) Physical examinations and diagnostic and referral services.

(E) Prenatal care.

(2) Mental health services, including all of the following:

(A) Primary prevention.

(B) Crisis intervention.

(C) Assessments and referrals.

(3) Trauma-informed mental health care, including substance abuse
 prevention, early intervention, and treatment services, including all of the following:

(A) Training for teachers, early educators, and school personnel in the detection of mental health problems, the impact of trauma and toxic stress, trauma-informed care and education, building resiliency, and helping pupils and families heal.

(B) Outreach, risk assessment, and education for pupils and families.

(C) Youth-focused substance use disorder prevention and treatment programs that are culturally and gender competent, trauma informed, and evidence based.

(4) Family support and parenting education, including child abuse prevention and parenting programs, such as home visits or, when in-person home visits are not possible, virtually conducted home visits.

(5) Academic support services, including tutoring, mentoring, employment, and community service internships, and in-service training for teachers and administrators.

(6) Counseling, including family counseling, peer-to-peer counseling, and suicide prevention.

(7) Services and counseling for children who experience violence, toxic stress, or adverse childhood experiences in their communities.

(8) Nutrition services to reduce food insecurity.

(9) Youth development services, including tutoring, mentoring, career development, and job placement.

(10) Case management services.

(11) Provision of onsite or virtual Medi-Cal eligibility workers, as allowed via telehealth pursuant to Section 1320b-5 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(s) “Technical assistance” means a structure to deliver training and technical assistance to grantees using regional collaboratives and state, regional, and local technical assistance providers that have expertise in pupil and family engagement, school-community collaboration of service delivery and financing, the coordination and integration of support services, and multiindicator data collection and evaluation.

(t) “Unduplicated pupil” has the same meaning as defined in Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 16.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8901.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that fidelity to the California Community Schools Framework supports pupil well-being and academic achievement, and recognizes the framework adopted by the state board in January 2022 is consistent with this purpose. To this end, the state board shall adopt and maintain an implementation Framework for the California Community Schools Partnership Act that is responsive to evidence and research on the California Community Schools Partnership Program model and outcomes.

(b) The state board shall adopt and maintain a framework for the California Community Schools Partnership Act, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The statutory pillars described in subdivision (b) of Section 8901.

(2) The key conditions of learning, cornerstone commitments, and proven practices consistent with successful community school research, including, but not limited to, embedded instructional and service coordination practices, shared governance, community engagement, and integration with other community-based approaches like Promise Neighborhoods.

(3) Required data, reporting, and accountability elements necessary for schoolsite, local educational agency, and system of support continuous improvement, including ,but not limited to, measurable indicators for shared governance, community engagement, and integration of services at the county and regional levels.

(4) Differentiated elements for elementary and secondary community school
 models.

(5) Differentiated measures for local educational agency and schoolsite readiness to implement a new community school, and achieve certification described in subdivision (k) of Section 8902.

(6) Key practices for county coordinators and regional transformational assistance centers.

(c) The state board shall review and adopt, as necessary, an updated framework, consistent with this section, on or before January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, in response to the California Community Schools Partnership Program evaluation results and certification recommendations pursuant to Section 8902, and other research on the program’s pupil and system outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 17.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8902.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The COVID-19 pandemic has continued to exacerbate conditions associated with poverty, including food insecurity, housing and employment instability, and inadequate health care.

(2) Community schools offer unique models to more efficiently and effectively provide trauma-informed integrated educational, health, and mental health services to pupils with a wide range of needs that have been affected by the COVID-19 pandemic.

(3) Additional investment in community schools that provide integrated pupil supports, community partnerships, and expanded learning opportunities will
 help address the trauma and loss of learning that have resulted from the COVID-19 pandemic. Statewide investment in community schools, supported by local networks designed to coordinate services and resources, is critical to realize whole-child education.

(b) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of two billion eight hundred thirty-six million six hundred sixty thousand dollars ($2,836,660,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department to administer the California Community Schools Partnership Program, established by Section 117 of Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020, as amended by Section 63 of Chapter 110 of the Statutes of 2020, in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section. These funds shall be used in accordance with the California Community Schools Framework, as adopted by the state board. These funds shall not be used for punitive disciplinary practices or the engagement of campus law enforcement. These
 funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2032. The funds shall be distributed as follows:

(1) At least two billion six hundred ninety-four million eight hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars ($2,694,827,000) shall be allocated to establish new, and expand existing, community schools supported by local educational agencies or consortiums that help coordinate services and manage learning networks for these schools.

(2) Up to one hundred forty-one million eight hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($141,833,000) shall be allocated to contract with local educational agencies to create a network of at least five regional technical assistance centers, pursuant to subdivision (l), to provide support and assistance to local educational agencies, or consortiums, and community schools through the 2029–30 school year or at the time when the new community
 schools technical assistance structure developed pursuant to Section 8903 is adopted by the state board. The department shall designate one of the regional technical assistance centers to be the state transformational assistance center for purposes of this chapter. Beginning in the 2026–27 school year, the regional technical assistance center serving as the state transformational assistance center may continue serving in that capacity through the 2029–30 school year or until the new community schools technical assistance structure developed pursuant to Section 8903 is adopted by the state board. Regional technical assistance center responsibilities shall include all of the following, as determined by the state transformational assistance center:

(A) Outreach and technical assistance to potential applicants as needed before or after awarding a grant under the program under this section and to community schools participating in the California Community Schools Partnership Program established pursuant to Section 8903.

(B) Development of community school resources, sharing of best practices, and data collection and use, consistent with the Community Schools framework.

(C) (i) The state transformational assistance center shall be responsible for the development of optional centralized planning templates to support interagency planning and the leveraging of funding for the community school initiative, including, but not limited to, funding from the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program, the California state preschool program, Universal Transitional Kindergarten, universal meal programs,
 health and mental health supports for pupils and staff, career technical education and college readiness initiatives, the local control funding formula, and any other available local, state, or federal funds that may facilitate and sustain the community school initiative.

(ii) The department shall require the centralized planning templates to be available to local educational agencies on or before January 1, 2028, and to be updated annually for new or amended funding sources.

(D) Facilitation of peer support networks for qualifying entities and county offices of education to support community engagement and the provision of supports within a multi-tiered system of support leading to positive and equitable pupil academic and well-being outcomes, as well as positive school climate outcomes, for both state and local measures identified in the local educational agency’s local control
 and accountability plan.

(E) Support local educational agencies in blending initiatives and funding consistent with the Community Schools framework, including, but not limited to, Promise Neighborhoods, Dream Resource Centers, Expanded Learning Opportunities Program, and Career and College readiness initiatives.

(3) (A) (i) Up to one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) shall be allocated to county offices of education serving at least two qualifying entities receiving grant funding pursuant to subdivision (g) or (h) to coordinate county-level governmental, nonprofit community-based organizations, and other external partnerships to support community school implementation at grant recipients under this section and Section 8903 in their county. This shall include designating a county-level community schools liaison to coordinate
 with the department and technical assistance centers in capacity building, resource connection, and continuous improvement activities consistent with supporting grant recipients in their county in implementation of community schools, as specified in subdivisions (g) and (h).

(ii) County office of education grant awards under this paragraph shall also be used to de-silo programs and services that can uplift and support the whole child, with the overall goal of moving towards fully integrating county-level community schools implementation supports and services into the larger statewide system of support by embedding these supports and services within the county’s universal and targeted assistance approach once one-time coordination grants conclude. A county office of education may also use its existing coordination grant funding to implement Section 8903.

(iii) County office of
 education grant award amounts under this paragraph shall be determined based on the number of community schools funded pursuant to this section, and the number of pupils served in those schools, using an allocation formula determined by the department, and provide at least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) and up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually through the 2029–30 fiscal year for each qualifying county office of education. These funds are separate from any funds county offices of education receive pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) for serving as qualifying entities to a network of community schools.

(B) County offices of education receiving funds pursuant to this paragraph shall support centralized grant recipient communications with county-level governmental partners and funding sources, which may include, but not be limited to, pupil support and health care service billing and billing practices technical
 assistance, leading a County Children’s Cabinet, and coordination with Promise Neighborhoods lead organizations and agencies.

(C) County offices of education receiving funds pursuant to this paragraph shall support local educational agency planning and use of pupil and campus data, consistent with the guidance of the System of Support Equity Leads, and the state transformational assistance center, for integrating community school, expanded learning, early childhood education, county behavioral health, educator professional development, and other state-funded initiatives integral to the pillars of a community school approach as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8901, which may be part of the qualifying entity’s local control and accountability plan process pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable.

(c) On or before November 15, 2021, the department, with the
 approval of the state board, shall update as necessary the application process and administration plan for the selection of grant recipients under the program, which may include prioritization for awards. After November 15, 2021, the department shall update the state board on an annual basis regarding the administration of this section and present to the state board any proposed changes to the application process and administration plan.

(d) The department shall award, subject to the approval of the state board, grants on a competitive basis to qualifying entities for planning grants for new community schools, implementation grants for new community schools or for the expansion or continuation of existing community schools, as provided, to representative qualifying entities in northern, central, and southern California, and in urban, suburban, and rural areas.

(e) A qualifying
 entity seeking a grant under this section shall submit an application to the department at a time and in a manner, and with any appropriate information, as the department may reasonably require. Each grant application submitted shall include all of the following:

(1) A description and documentation of how the participating community and cooperating agencies have been and will be engaged in the community school model.

(2) A description of all of the programs and services to be provided at the schoolsite, at a site near or adjacent to the school, or virtually.

(3) A description of all direct and indirect resources to be used for the community school program, and the agencies responsible for the implementation of the program.

(4) Provisions for data
 collection and recordkeeping, including records of the population served, the components of the service, the outcomes of the service, and costs, including all of the following:

(A) Direct costs.

(B) Indirect costs.

(C) Costs to other agencies.

(D) Cost savings.

(f) The department shall prioritize grant funding to qualifying entities who meet all of the following:

(1) Serve pupils in schools or a partner school or schools in which at least 80 percent of the pupil population are unduplicated pupils.

(2) Demonstrate a need for expanded access to integrated
 services, including those disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic.

(3) Involve pupils, parents, certificated and classified school staff, and cooperating agency personnel in the process of identifying the needs of pupils and families, and in the planning of support services to be offered.

(4) Commit to providing trauma-informed health, mental health, and social services for pupils within a multi-tiered system of support at the schoolsite, or an adjacent location, and partner with other schools, school districts, county agencies, or nongovernmental organizations.

(5) For qualifying entities that serve elementary school pupils, or for schools where there is a demonstrated need for childcare, including, but not limited to, programs for pregnant and parenting teens, commit to providing early care and
 education services for children from birth to five years of age, inclusive, through one or more local educational agencies or community-based organizations.

(6) Identify a cooperating agency collaboration process, including cosignatories, a mechanism for sharing governance, which may include a plan to use existing or create shared decisionmaking teams that include pupils, families, educators, and community-based organizations, and for integrating or redirecting existing resources and other school support services.

(7) Plan to support a network of site-based community schools at schoolsites that have the capacity to ensure that services, professional development, and engagement can occur on schoolsite, or at an adjacent location, with the support of community-based organizations and other relevant providers, for all relevant stakeholders.

(8) Identify a plan to sustain community school services after grant expiration, including by maximizing reimbursement for services from available sources, including, but not limited to, the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities program, and reimbursable mental health specialty care services provided under the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(a)(4)(B)).

(g) (1) Of the amount identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), including all other funds appropriated for this program in the Budget Act of 2021, at least 10 percent shall be available for planning grants of up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per qualifying entity, and shall be allocated in the 2021–22 and 2022–23 fiscal years, for up to a two-year planning grant period,
 for local educational agencies with no existing community schools. The planning grant may be used for any of the following purposes:

(A) Staffing costs for a community school coordinator.

(B) Conducting a comprehensive school and community needs and asset assessment, including, but not limited to, pupil and community demographics, school climate, integrated support services, expanded learning time, educator, family, pupil, and community engagement, new or existing partnerships with governmental entities or community-based organizations, and available funding sources.

(C) Grant application support, service billing development, and other administrative costs necessary to launch a community school model at scale.

(D) Partnership development and
 coordination support between the grantee and cooperating agencies.

(E) Providing training and support to local educational agency and cooperating agency personnel to develop best practices for integrating instruction and pupil supports.

(F) Preparing a community school implementation plan for submission to the governing board or body of the local educational agency and to the department.

(2) Any remaining planning grant funding available at the conclusion of the planning grant period shall be made available for implementation grants.

(h) (1) Of the amount identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), including all other funds appropriated for this program in the Budget Act of 2021, up to 72 percent shall be available for
 implementation grants to qualified entities. Implementation grants shall be at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually per schoolsite for new community schools or for the expansion or continuation of existing community schools that agree to align with the provisions of this section. New and existing community schools shall be funded for five years, upon submission to the department of a community school plan and evidence of ongoing progress as part of the annual formative evaluations specified in subdivision (n). The implementation grant may be used for any of the following purposes:

(A) Staffing, including, but not limited to, a community school coordinator, and contractor capacity.

(B) Coordinating and providing support services to pupils and families at or near community schools, including through childcare,
 expanded learning time before and after school, and during school intersessions.

(C) Providing training and support to local educational agency personnel and partner agency personnel on integrating school-based pupil supports, social-emotional well-being, trauma-informed practices, and establishing sustainable community school funding sources.

(D) Designing and executing educator, family, pupil, and community engagement strategies.

(E) Ongoing data collection and program evaluations, including at least one measure of growth in individual pupil well-being as measured through pupil surveys or the compilation of screening tool results.

(F) Implementing the sustainability plan described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) and updating the plan as
 necessary.

(G) Securing various long-term funding streams and commitments from partners that will continue to provide financial assistance or other means of support.

(H) Building capacity around sustainability and other efforts to support ongoing community school programming.

(I) Conducting a comprehensive school and community needs and asset assessment to support a continuous improvement process.

(2) The department shall prioritize new community schools for implementation grants under paragraph (1) and those moneys shall supplement, not supplant, existing services and funds. For purposes of this section, continuing a position or services with these funds shall not be considered supplanting if the position or services were funded by a source that has
 legally expired.

(3) A local educational agency grantee may retain up to the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 10 percent of the total funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision for its sites each year. These funds shall be used to administer implementation grants locally, manage professional learning and networking, and coordinate services and funding streams for community schools under the local educational agency grantee. Funds retained by the local educational agency grantee to provide direct services to pupils may be retained separately from this administrative set-aside.

(4) The funding under paragraph (3) shall supplement, and not supplant, existing services and funds, and shall be used for ongoing coordination of services, management of the community school, and ongoing data collection and program evaluations.

(5) Implementation grant funds may carry over from year to year and are restricted to permitted uses of the funds.

(6) Qualifying entities that receive implementation grants shall annually report and publicly present their community school plans, including data and outcomes from the prior year, at the schoolsite and at a meeting of the governing board of the school district, county board of education, or the governing body of the charter school. Implementation grant recipients shall publicly post their community school grant application and community schools plan on the local educational agency’s internet website.

(7) The department may allocate any funds returned pursuant to this subdivision for the purposes provided in subdivision (k).

(i) It is the intent
 of the Legislature that qualifying entities that serve high school pupils with significant populations of undocumented pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, implement a Dream Resource Center as part of their community school model.

(j) (1) All planning and implementation grants awarded under subdivisions (g) and (h) shall be matched by the qualifying entity or its cooperating agencies with a local match equal to one-third of the grant amount. The local match shall be contributed in cash or as services or resources of comparable value, as determined by the department.

(2) The department shall reserve adequate funding pursuant to this section to preserve capacity for qualifying entities receiving planning grants pursuant to subdivision (g) to receive implementation grants pursuant to subdivision (h) at the end of their planning grant period, if all planning
 grant requirements are met and planning grantee applicants meet implementation grant eligibility requirements pursuant to this section.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2024, the department shall prioritize awarding implementation grants to planning grantees. Notwithstanding paragraph (2), to the extent that sufficient funding is not available to fund implementation grants for all planning grantee applicants, the department shall use the priorities described in subdivision (f) to determine which planning grantee schools receive implementation grants.

(k) Of the amount identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), at least eighty-four million dollars ($84,000,000) shall be available for reappropriation in the 2026–27 fiscal year and to support all of the following:

(1) Up to twenty-eight million dollars ($28,000,000), subject
 to the approval of the state board, for the state transformational assistance center to support the long-term planning of the California Community Schools Apportionments Program, including the development of the reporting, accountability, and certification requirements and processes. Funds shall be used for all of the following purposes:

(A) Up to three million dollars ($3,000,000), available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to conduct or commission a set of analyses to inform the long-term technical assistance, reporting, accountability, and certification process for community schools. The state transformational assistance center may conduct these analyses or select one or more institutions of higher education to conduct the analyses no later than January 1, 2028. If an institution or institutions of higher education is selected to conduct these analyses, the institution or institutions may work with a research-based
 nonprofit organization. Indirect costs applied to contracts with entities conducting the analyses shall not exceed 10 percent of the contract amount. The analyses shall do all of the following:

(i) Summarize research on the features associated with community schools’ progress and success, including community schools that have been previously established.
